src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V1xb-PastSubj       ! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:inn  NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:innse   NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:iteá NegQLen;
+3P+Sg:adh  NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:imis NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:imisne  NegQLen;
+2P+Pl:adh  NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:idís NegQLen;
+Auto:ití   NegQLen;

LEXICON V1xb-Imper      ! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:^igh^Verbim      NegImper;
+2P+Sg:0        NegImper;
+3P+Sg:^igh^Verbadh     NegImper;
+1P+Pl:^igh^Verbimis        NegImper;
+2P+Pl:^igh^Verbigí     NegImper;
+3P+Pl:^igh^Verbidís        NegImper;
+Auto:^igh^Verbitear    NegImper;

!***************************************************************************
LEXICON V1-SV   ! 1st. Conjugation - ! Slender F Slender T 
                ! ending in  -éigh

                    

+PresInd:^igh^Verb  V1xc-PresInd;   !*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0      V1xc-PastInd;
+FutInd:^igh^Verb   V1xc-FutInd;
+PastImp:^igh^Verb  V1xc-PastImp;   
                    

+Cond:^igh^Verb     V1xc-Cond;  !*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

                    
+PresSubj:^igh^Verb V1xc-PresSubj;  !*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:^igh^Verb   V1xc-PastSubj;

                    
+Imper:0        V1xc-Imper; !*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON V1xc-PresInd        ! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
+1P+Sg:ím   NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ímse    NegQ;
0:íonn      NegQ;
+1P+Pl:ímid NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ímidne  NegQ;
+Auto:itear NegQ;       ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel:íos^Sé #;

LEXICON V1xc-PastInd        ! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
+1P+Sg:^igh^Verbíos     NegQPast;   ! 14 Feb
0:^Verb         NegQPast;
+1P+Pl:^igh^Verbíomar   NegQPast;
+Auto:^igh^Verbíodh     NegQSaor;

LEXICON V1xc-FutInd     ! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
+1P+Sg:íos  NegQ;   ! 14 Feb
0:ífidh     NegQ;
+1P+Pl:ífimid   NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ífimidne    NegQ;
+Auto:ífear NegQ;   
+Rel:ífeas^Sé   #;  


LEXICON V1xc-PastImp        ! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:íodh  NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:ínn^Sé   NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ínnse^Sé    NegQ;
+2P+Sg:iteá NegQLen;
!!!!+3P+Sg:íodh NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:ímis NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ímisne  NegQLen;
!!!!+2P+Pl:íodh NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:ídís NegQLen;
+Auto:ití   NegQLen;        


LEXICON V1xc-Cond       ! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach
+CM:ífeadh      #;  ! munster variation
0:ífeadh        NegQLen;
+1P+Sg:ífinn        NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ífinnse     NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:ífeá     NegQLen;
!!!+3P+Sg:ífeadh        NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:ífimis       NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ífimisne        NegQLen;
!!!+2P+Pl:ífeadh        NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:ífidís       NegQLen;
+Auto:ífí       NegQLen;        

    
LEXICON V1xc-PresSubj       ! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:í     NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:ímid NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ímidne  NegSubj;
+Auto:itear NegSubj;        



LEXICON V1xc-PastSubj       ! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:ínn  NegQLen;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ínnse   NegQLen;
+2P+Sg:iteá NegQLen;
+3P+Sg:íodh NegQLen;
+1P+Pl:ímis NegQLen;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ímisne  NegQLen;
+2P+Pl:íodh NegQLen;
+3P+Pl:ídís NegQLen;
+Auto:ití   NegQLen;        
        

LEXICON V1xc-Imper      ! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:^igh^Verbím      NegImper;
+2P+Sg:0            NegImper;
+3P+Sg:^igh^Verbíodh    NegImper;
+1P+Pl:^igh^Verbímis    NegImper;
+2P+Pl:^igh^Verbígí     NegImper;
+3P+Pl:^igh^Verbídís    NegImper;
+Auto:^igh^Verbitear    NegImper;       

!**************************************************************************
! NO LONGER USED - V1-SL-BR should now be used 
LEXICON V1-SL-X     ! 1st. Conjugation - slender becomes broad

0:^Lea  V1-BR;
!**************************************************************************
! NEW  15/05/08 
LEXICON V1-SL-BR-sync   ! 1st. Conjugation - slender is sync. and becomes broad
            ! except Imperative 2P Sg remains slender AND
            ! all Past remains slender except 1P Pl
0:^Coim     V1-SL-BR;
!**************************************************************************
! NEW  02/05/08 
LEXICON V1-SL-BR    ! 1st. Conjugation - slender becomes broad
            ! except Imperative 2P Sg remains slender AND
            ! all Past remains slender except 1P Pl

                    !*** 2 NEW CATEGORIES 02/05/2008
+Imper:0        V1xd-Imper; !*** BROADEN ALL EXCEPT 2P Sg
+PastInd:0      V1xd-PastInd;   !*** ALL STAY SLENDER EXCEPT 1P Pl
                    
+PresInd:^Lea^Verb  V1b-PresInd;    !*** BROADEN 
+FutInd:^Lea^Verb   V1b-FutInd; !*** BROADEN 
+PastImp:^Lea^Verb  V1b-PastImp;    !*** BROADEN 

+Cond:^Lea^Verb     V1b-Cond;   !*** BROADEN
                    
+PresSubj:^Lea^Verb     V1b-PresSubj;   !*** BROADEN
!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:^Verb   V1b-PastSubj;

LEXICON V1xd-Imper      ! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:^Lea^Verbaim     NegImper;
+1P+Sg+Emph:^Lea^Verbaimse  NegImper;
+2P+Sg:^Verb            NegImper;
+3P+Sg:^Lea^Verbadh     NegImper;
+1P+Pl:^Lea^Verbaimis       NegImper;
+1P+Pl+Emph:^Leaaimisne     NegImper;
+2P+Pl:^Lea^Verbaigí        NegImper;
+3P+Pl:^Lea^Verbaidís       NegImper;
+Auto:^Leatar           NegImper;
                    
LEXICON V1xd-PastInd        ! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
0:^Verb             NegQPast;
+1P+Sg:^Verbeas         NegQPast;   ! 14 Feb
+1P+Pl:^Lea^Verbamar        NegQPast;
+1P+Pl+Emph:^Lea^Verbamarna NegQPast;
+3P+Pl:^Verbeadar       NegQPast;
+Auto:^Verbeadh         NegQSaor;       

!**************************************************************************
 
LEXICON V1-SL-LC        ! 1st. Conjugation - slender becomes broad except where
            ! the ending starts with t
0:^LC   V1-BR;



!***************************************************************************
!**************************************************************************
 
LEXICON V2-BR   ! 2nd. Conjugation - broad

0:^aigh V2-BR-0;

!**************************************************************************
 
LEXICON V2-SL   ! 2nd. Conjugation - slender

0:^Caol^igh V2-BR-0;

!**************************************************************************
 
LEXICON V2-BR-sync  ! 2nd. Conjugation - broad - syncopated

0:^Coim V2-BR-0;

!**************************************************************************
 
LEXICON V2-SL-sync  ! 2nd. Conjugation - slender - syncopated

0:^Caol^Coim    V2-BR-0;

!**************************************************************************

LEXICON V2-BR-0 ! 2nd. Conjugation - broad
                    
+PresInd:^Verb  V2-BR-PresInd;  !*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:^Verb      V2-BR-PastInd;
+FutInd:^Verb       V2-BR-FutInd;
+PastImp:^Verb      V2-BR-PastImp;  
                    

+Cond:^Verb     V2-BR-Cond; !*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

                    
+PresSubj:^Verb V2-BR-PresSubj; !*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:^Verb    V2-BR-PastSubj;

                    
+Imper:^Verb        V2-BR-Imper;    !*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON V2-BR-PresInd       ! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:aíonn     NegQ;
+1P+Sg:aím  NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:aímse   NegQ;
+1P+Pl:aímid    NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aímidne NegQ;
+Auto:aítear    NegQ;       ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel:aíos^Sé    #;      ! a choiglíos

LEXICON V2-BR-PastInd       ! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

+1P+Sg:aíos NegQPast;       ! 14 Feb
0:^Fr       NegQPast;   ! 
+1P+Pl:aíomar   NegQPast;
+1P+Pl+Emph:aíomarna    NegQPast;
+3P+Pl:aíodar   NegQPast;
+Auto:aíodh NegQSaor;       

LEXICON V2-BR-FutInd        ! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
+1P+Sg:aíos NegQ;       ! 14 Feb
0:óidh      NegQ;
+1P+Pl:óimid    NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:óimidne NegQ;
+Auto:ófar  NegQ;       
+Rel:ós^Sé  #;      ! a chosnós
